Arkansas, session 2025, HB1714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-8-801(3), concerning the definition of a
"paid canvasser" for a local option election, is amended to read as follows:
(3) “Paid canvasser” means a person who in exchange for or as a
reward for soliciting or obtaining a signature on a petition:
(A) is Is paid or with whom there is an agreement to pay
money or anything of value before or after a signature on a local option
election petition is solicited in exchange for soliciting or obtaining a
signature on a petition.; or
(B) Receives anything of value before or after a signature
on a local option election petition is solicited;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-601(c), concerning hiring and training
of paid canvassers for initiatives, referenda, and constitutional amendments,
is amended to read as follows:
(c) As used in this section, “paid canvasser” means a person who in
exchange for or as a reward for soliciting a signature on a petition:
(1) is Is paid or with whom there is an agreement to pay money
or anything of value before or after a signature on an initiative or
*SSS162*
04-02-2025 11:22:12 SSS162

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 HB1714
referendum petition is solicited in exchange for soliciting a signature on a
petition; or
(2) Receives anything of value before or after a signature on an
initiative or referendum petition is solicited.


/s/Rose





























04-02-2025 11:22:12 SSS162